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ATF Temperature Sensor
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DI−124
−DIAGNOSTICS AUTOMATICTRANSMISSION(A442F)

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

DTC P07 10/38TransmissionFluidTemperatureSensor
Malfunction (ATF Temperature Sensor)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The ATF temperature sensor converts fluid temperature into a resistance value which is input into the Engine
andECTECU(2UZ −FE,1FZ −FE)orECTECU(1HZ,1HD −T,1HD −FTE).

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0710/38

Either (a) or (b) is detected for 0.5 sec. or more.
(2−tripdetection logic)
(a)Temperaturesensor resistance is less than79 �

(b) After the engine has been operating for 15 minutes or
more, the resistanceat the temp.sensor ismore than156k �

SOpenorshort inATF temperaturesensor
SATFtemperaturesensor
SEngineandECTECU(2UZ −FE,1FZ −FE)
SECTECU(1HZ,1HD −T,1HD −FTE)

WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check ATF temperature sensor.

PREPARATION:
Remove the ATF temperature sensor (See page AT−8) .
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 5 of solenoid con-
nector at 10 ˚ C (50 ˚ F) and 110 ˚ C (230 ˚ F).
OK:

Resistance (Approx.):
10 ˚ C (50 ˚ F): 6.5 k�
11 0 ˚ C (230 ˚F):  200 −  300 �

NG Replace the ATF temperature sensor.

OK

2 Check harness and connector between ATF temperature sensor and Engine and
ECT ECU or ECT ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace the harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
or ECT ECU (See page IN−35).


